Maryland, session 2026, HB1354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
2–305.1.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1354*

HOUSE BILL 1354
(a) (1) The Board may authorize the practice of a health occupation on an
animal by a health care practitioner licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized under the
Health Occupations Article.
(2) If the Board authorizes the practice of a health occupation on an animal
under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Board may:
(i) Impose requirements for education, training, and supervision by
a veterinary practitioner; and
(ii) Require the registration of each health care practitioner
authorized to practice a health occupation on an animal in accordance with this subsection.
(b) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
Board shall establish an expedited process to authorize [a]:
(I) A veterinary practitioner who holds a current, valid license to
practice veterinary medicine in another state or jurisdiction to become licensed to practice
veterinary medicine in the State; AND
(II) A VETERINARY ASSISTANT OR VETERINARY TECHNICIAN
WHO HOLDS AN AUTHORIZATION OR A REGISTRATION TO PERFORM VETERINARY
CARE IN ANOTHER STATE OR JURISDICTION TO PERFORM OR BECOME REGISTERED
TO PERFORM VETERINARY CARE IN THE STATE.
(2) THE BOARD MAY PROVIDE AN AUTHORIZATION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ONLY IF THE STATE OR JURISDICTION IN
WHICH THE APPLICANT IS LICENSED, AUTHORIZED, OR REGISTERED, AS
APPLICABLE, OFFERS A SIMILAR RECIPROCAL PROCESS TO INDIVIDUALS LICENSED,
AUTHORIZED, OR REGISTERED BY THE BOARD.
2–306.
(a) (1) The Board has the exclusive power to establish and alter the standards
of preliminary and professional education and training requirements of applicants for the
examination for a license.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO ALLOW TIME SPENT
AS A VETERINARY TECHNICIAN TO BE CREDITED TOWARD MEETING THE
PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION OR TRAINING REQUIREMENTS FOR LICENSURE AS A
VETERINARY PRACTITIONER.
(3) The Board may establish an annual continuing education requirement
of at least 12 hours as a condition to any license renewal.

HOUSE BILL 1354 3
2–309.
(a) A person may register with the Board as a veterinary technician.
(b) (1) There is a Veterinary Technician Committee under the Board’s
jurisdiction. The Committee consists of 7 members who are appointed by the Board, subject
to the approval of the Secretary. The Board shall determine the qualifications and term of
each member.
(2) Each member of the Committee may not receive compensation but is
entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State Travel Regulations as
provided in the State budget.
(c) The Committee, subject to the Board’s approval shall:
(1) Evaluate, examine, and determine the qualifications for applicants for
registration as a veterinary technician;
(2) Recommend to the Board the subject, scope, form, date, time, and
location for each examination;
(3) ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO ALLOW TIME SPENT AS A VETERINARY
ASSISTANT TO BE CREDITED TOWARD MEETING THE QUALIFICATIONS FOR
REGISTRATION AS A VETERINARY TECHNICIAN;
(4) Establish continuing education requirements for veterinary
technicians;
[(4)] (5) Define the duties and responsibilities of registered veterinary
technicians;
[(5)] (6) Recommend to the Board reasonable rules and regulations to
carry out the provisions of this section; and
[(6)] (7) Generally assist the Board in registering and regulating
veterinary technicians.
(d) To apply for registration, an applicant shall:
(1) Submit an application to the Board on the form the Board requires; and
(2) Pay to the Board an application fee set by the Board.
(e) The Board shall register any applicant who:
(1) Meets the requirements of this section;

HOUSE BILL 1354
(2) Meets the Board’s educational requirements;
(3) Passes a Board approved examination;
(4) Is of good moral character; and
(5) Is at least 18 years old.
(f) A registration is issued for a term of 3 years and expires on June 30 of the
third year after the date issued unless the registration is renewed as provided in this
section.
(g) The Board shall renew the registration of any applicant for an additional
3–year term if the applicant:
(1) Submits a renewal application on the form that the Board requires;
(2) Pays to the Board a renewal fee set by the Board;
(3) Complies with the Board’s continuing education requirements; and
(4) Otherwise is entitled to be registered.
(h) In accordance with the hearing provisions of § 2–311 of this subtitle, the Board
may refuse to register an applicant, suspend or revoke the registration, or reprimand and
censure, or place on probation any veterinary technician, if the veterinary technician:
(1) Practices veterinary medicine except as permitted under this subtitle;
(2) Fraudulently or deceptively obtains a registration;
(3) Is professionally, physically, or mentally incompetent;
(4) Is convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude;
(5) Is convicted of a violation of any federal or State law relating to narcotic
drugs;
(6) Is grossly negligent or deliberately cruel to an animal;
(7) Violates any provisions of this subtitle; or
(8) Is determined by the Board to be incompetent as a veterinary
technician.

HOUSE BILL 1354 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.